Washington statutes.
RCW 35.60.070

Chapter supplemental to other laws.

The powers and authority conferred upon municipalities under the provisions of this chapter, shall be construed as in addition and supplemental to powers or authority conferred by any other law, and nothing contained herein shall be construed as limiting any other powers or authority of such municipalities.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.60.070. Prior: 1961 c 149 s 7; prior: 1961 c 39 s 7.]